Missouri, session 2026, SB1798.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.032, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 304.032,
to read as follows:
304.032. 1. [No person shall operate a utility
vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, upon the highways of
this state, except as follows:
(1) Utility vehicles owned and operated by a
governmental entity for official use;
(2) Utility vehicles operated for agricultural
purposes or industrial on-premises purposes between the
official sunrise and sunset on the day of operation, unless
equipped with proper lighting;
(3) Utility vehicles operated by handicapped persons
for short distances occasionally only on the state's
secondary roads when operated between the hours of sunrise
and sunset;
(4) Governing bodies of cities may issue special
permits for utility vehicles to be used on highways within
the city limits by licensed drivers. Fees of fifteen
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1798 2
dollars may be collected and retained by cities for such
permits;
(5) Governing bodies of counties may issue special
permits for utility vehicles to be used on county roads
within the county by licensed drivers. Fees of fifteen
dollars may be collected and retained by the counties for
such permits;
(6) Municipalities may by resolution or ordinance
allow utility vehicle operation on streets or highways under
the governing body's jurisdiction. Any person operating a
utility vehicle pursuant to a municipal resolution or
ordinance shall maintain proof of financial responsibility
in accordance with section 303.160 or maintain any other
insurance policy providing equivalent liability coverage for
a utility vehicle] Any person may operate a utility vehicle,
as defined in section 301.010, upon streets and highways
where the posted speed limit is fifty-five miles per hour.
This subsection does not prohibit a utility vehicle from
crossing a road or street at an intersection where the road
or street being crossed has a posted speed limit of more
than fifty-five miles per hour.
2. Any person operating a utility vehicle shall
maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance
with section 303.160 or maintain any other insurance policy
providing equivalent liability coverage for a utility
vehicle.
3. No person shall operate a utility vehicle within
any stream or river in this state, except that utility
vehicles may be operated within waterways which flow within
the boundaries of land which a utility vehicle operator
owns, or for agricultural purposes within the boundaries of
land which a utility vehicle operator owns or has permission

SB 1798 3
to be upon, or for the purpose of fording such stream or
river of this state at such road crossings as are customary
or part of the highway system. All law enforcement
officials or peace officers of this state and its political
subdivisions or department of conservation agents or
department of natural resources park rangers shall enforce
the provisions of this subsection within the geographic area
of their jurisdiction.
[3.] 4. A person operating a utility vehicle on a
highway [pursuant to an exception covered in this section]
shall have a valid operator's or chauffeur's license, except
that a handicapped person operating such vehicle [under
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section] for short
distances occasionally only on this state's roads when
operated between the hours of sunrise and sunset, but shall
not be required to have passed an examination for the
operation of a motorcycle, and the vehicle shall be operated
at speeds of less than forty-five miles per hour.
[4.] 5. No persons shall operate a utility vehicle:
(1) In any careless way so as to endanger the person
or property of another; or
(2) While under the influence of alcohol or any
controlled substance.
[5.] 6. No operator of a utility vehicle shall carry a
passenger, except for agricultural purposes. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to any utility vehicle in
which the seat of such vehicle is designed to carry more
than one person.
[6.] 7. A violation of this section shall be a class C
misdemeanor. In addition to other legal remedies, the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may
institute a civil action in a court of competent

SB 1798 4
jurisdiction for injunctive relief to prevent such violation
or future violations and for the assessment of a civil
penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars per day of
violation.
✓